Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.12, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Literacy goal. (a) The legislature seeks to have every child reading at or above grade level every year, beginning in kindergarten, and to support multilingual learners and students receiving special education services in achieving their individualized reading goals in order to meet grade-level benchmarks. By the 2026-2027 school year, districts must provide evidence-based reading instruction through a focus on student mastery of the foundational reading skills of phonemic awareness, phonics, and fluency, as well as the development of oral language, vocabulary, and reading comprehension skills. Students must receive evidence-based instruction that is proven to effectively teach children to read, consistent with sections 120B.118 to 120B.124. (b) To meet this goal, each district must provide teachers and instructional support staff with responsibility for teaching reading new text begin and licensed library media specialists who select district library materials new text end with training on evidence-based reading instruction that is approved by the Department of Education by the deadlines provided in section 120B.123, subdivision 5. (c) Districts are strongly encouraged to adopt a MTSS framework. The framework should include a process for engaging families and communities, monitoring student progress, evaluating program fidelity, and analyzing student outcomes and needs in order to design and implement ongoing evidenced-based, culturally responsive instruction and interventions. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.12, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Identification; report. (a) Each school district must screen every student enrolled in kindergarten, grade 1, grade 2, and grade 3 using a screening tool approved by the Department of Education three times each school year: (1) within the first six weeks of the school year; (2) by February 15 each year; and (3) within the last six weeks of the school year. Students enrolled in kindergarten, grade 1, grade 2, and grade 3, including multilingual learners, students receiving special education services, and students enrolled in dual language immersion programs, must be universally screened for mastery of foundational reading skills, including phonemic awareness, phonics, decoding, fluency, oral language, and for characteristics of dyslexia as measured by a screening tool approved by the Department of Education. The screening for characteristics of dyslexia may be integrated with universal screening for mastery of foundational skills and expressive or receptive language mastery. The screening tool used must be a valid and reliable universal screener that is highly correlated with foundational reading skills. For students reading at grade level, beginning in the winter of grade 2, the oral reading fluency screener may be used to assess reading difficulties, including characteristics of dyslexia, without requiring a separate screening of each subcomponent of foundational reading skills. A district must submit data on student performance in kindergarten, grade 1, grade 2, and grade 3 on foundational reading skills, including phonemic awareness, phonics, decoding, fluency, and oral language to the Department of Education in the annual local literacy plan submission due on June 15. (b) For students enrolled in dual language immersion programs: (1) if students are screened in the partner language, they must be screened at the same interval as the screenings in English under paragraph (a); (2) if the program provides instruction in foundational reading skills in English, the students receiving that instruction must be screened in English; (3) if the program provides instruction in foundational reading skills in the partner language, the students receiving that instruction must be screened in the partner language; (4) if no screener is available in the partner language, the districts must identify how students' reading proficiency is assessed and how the districts determine and provide targeted reading instruction in the partner language and supports to students identified as needing additional support in developing mastery of foundational reading skills; and (5) the partner language screening tool must be approved by the district for kindergarten through grade 3 students. (c) Students in grades 4 and above, including multilingual learners and students receiving special education services, who are not reading at grade level must be screened for reading difficulties, including characteristics of dyslexia, using a screening tool approved by the Department of Education, and must continue to receive evidence-based instruction, interventions, and progress monitoring until the students achieve grade-level proficiency. A parent, in consultation with a teacher, may opt a student out of the literacy screener if the parent and teacher decide that continuing to screen would not be beneficial to the student. In such limited cases, the student must continue to receive progress monitoring and literacy interventions. (d) Reading screeners in English, and in the predominant languages of district students where practicable, must identify and evaluate students' areas of academic need related to literacy. The district also must monitor the progress and provide reading instruction appropriate to the specific needs of multilingual learners. The district must use an approved, developmentally appropriate, and culturally responsive screener and annually report summary screener results to the commissioner by June 15 in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. new text begin (e) After a student's initial screening for characteristics of dyslexia according to this subdivision, a school district, at its discretion, may determine when to screen English language learners who score below three on the annual ACCESS assessment for characteristics of dyslexia. new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end The district also must include in its local literacy plan under subdivision 4a, a summary of the district's efforts to screen, identify, and provide interventions to students who demonstrate characteristics of dyslexia as measured by a screening tool approved by the Department of Education. Districts are strongly encouraged to use a MTSS framework. With respect to students screened or identified under paragraph (a), the report must include: (1) a summary of the district's efforts to screen for characteristics of reading difficulties, including dyslexia; (2) the number of students universally screened for that reporting year; (3) the number of students demonstrating characteristics of dyslexia for that year; and (4) an explanation of how students identified under this subdivision are provided with alternate instruction and interventions under section 125A.56, subdivision 1. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.12, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Staff development. (a) A district must provide training on evidence-based structured literacy instruction to teachers and instructional staff in accordance with subdivision 1, paragraphs (b) and (c). The training must include teaching in the areas of phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary development, reading fluency, reading comprehension, and culturally and linguistically responsive pedagogy. (b) Each district shall use the data under subdivision 2 to identify the staff development needs so that: (1) elementary teachers are able to implement explicit, systematic, evidence-based instruction in the five reading areas of phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension with emphasis on mastery of foundational reading skills as defined in section 120B.119 and other literacy-related areas including writing until the student achieves grade-level reading and writing proficiency; (2) elementary teachers receive training to provide students with evidence-based reading and oral language instruction that meets students' developmental, linguistic, and literacy needs using the intervention methods or programs selected by the district for the identified students; (3) licensed teachers employed by the district have opportunities to improve reading and writing instruction through approved professional development identified in the local literacy plan; (4) licensed teachers recognize students' diverse needs in cross-cultural settings and are able to serve the oral language and linguistic needs of students who are multilingual learners by maximizing strengths in their native languages in order to cultivate students' English language development, including academic language development, and build academic literacy; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (5) licensed teachers are trained in culturally responsive pedagogy that enables students to master content, develop skills to access content, and build relationshipsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (6) licensed library media specialists employed by the district have sufficient training to select appropriate materials to supplement classroom reading and writing instruction and to serve the literacy needs of multilingual learners. new text end (c) A district that offers early childhood programs, including voluntary prekindergarten for eligible four-year-old children, early childhood special education, and school readiness programs, must provide classroom teachers in early childhood programs training approved by the Department of Education to provide children in early childhood programs with explicit, systematic instruction in phonological and phonemic awareness; oral language, including listening comprehension; vocabulary; and letter-sound correspondence. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.12, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. Local literacy plan. (a) Consistent with this section, a school district must adopt a local literacy plan to have every child reading at or above grade level every year beginning in kindergarten and to support multilingual learners and students receiving special education services in achieving their individualized reading goals. A district must update and submit the plan to the commissioner by June 15 each year. The plan must be consistent with the Read Act, and include the following: (1) a process to assess students' foundational reading skills, oral language, and level of reading proficiency and the approved screeners used, by school site and grade level, under section 120B.123; (2) a process to notify and involve parents; (3) a description of how schools in the district will determine the targeted reading instruction that is deleted text begin evidence-baseddeleted text end new text begin alignednew text end and includes an intervention strategy for a student and the process for intensifying or modifying the reading strategy in order to obtain measurable reading progress; (4) deleted text begin evidence-baseddeleted text end new text begin aligned and targetednew text end intervention methods for students who are not reading at or above grade level and progress monitoring to provide information on the effectiveness of the intervention; (5) identification of staff development needs, including a plan to meet those needs; (6) the curricula used by school site and grade level and, if applicable, the district plan and timeline for adopting deleted text begin evidence-baseddeleted text end new text begin alignednew text end curricula and materials starting in the 2025-2026 school year; (7) a statement of whether the district has adopted a MTSS framework; (8) student data using the measures of foundational literacy skills and mastery identified by the Department of Education for the following students: (i) students in kindergarten through grade 3; (ii) students who demonstrate characteristics of dyslexia; and (iii) students in grades 4 to 12 who are identified as not reading at grade level; (9) the number of teachers and other staff who have completed training approved by the department; (10) the number of teachers and other staff proposed for training in structured literacy; (11) how the district used funding provided under the Read Act to implement the requirements of the Read Act; (12) beginning as soon as practicable after the end of fiscal year 2026, how the district used literacy aid funding received under section 124D.98; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (13) beginning on December 31, 2025, for a district with a dual language immersion program: (i) the program's partner language; (ii) grade levels included in the program; (iii) the language used to screen students' foundational reading skills; (iv) the percentage of grade 3 students taking the Minnesota Comprehensive Assessments; and (v) the number of students in the program in grades 4 to 12 who are identified as not reading at grade leveldeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (14) a description of how schools in the district will use the school library media center to complement students' foundational reading skills with the guidance of a licensed library media specialist. new text end (b) Annually by June 15, the district must post its literacy plan on the official school district website and submit it to the commissioner of education using the template developed by the commissioner of education. (c) Districts must use a streamlined template developed by the commissioner of education for local literacy plans that meets the requirements of this subdivision and requires all reading instruction and teacher training in reading instruction to be evidence-based. The template must require a district to report information using the student categories required in the commissioner's report under paragraph (d). The template must focus district resources on improving students' foundational reading skills while reducing paperwork requirements for teachers. (d) By December 1, 2025, the commissioner of education must submit a report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over prekindergarten through grade 12 education summarizing the local literacy plans submitted to the commissioner. The summary must include the following information: (1) the number of teachers and other staff, by grade level, who have completed training approved by the Department of Education; (2) the number of teachers and other staff, by grade level, required to complete the training under section 120B.123, subdivision 5, who have not completed the training; (3) the number of teachers exempt under section 120B.123, subdivision 5, from completing training approved by the Department of Education; (4) the statewide total number of teachers or other staff required to complete the training under section 120B.123, subdivision 5, that have received other training or education that meets the requirements of the training approved by the Department of Education; (5) by school site and grade, the approved screeners and the reading curriculum used; (6) by school site and grade, using the measurements of foundational literacy skills and mastery identified by the department, both aggregated data and disaggregated data on student performance on the approved screeners using the student categories under section 120B.35, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (2); and (7) information about dual language immersion programs. (e) By December 1, 2026, and December 1, 2027, the commissioner of education must submit updated reports containing the information required under paragraph (d) and updates and recommendations from the dual language immersion advisory committee established under subdivision 6, to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over prekindergarten through grade 12 education. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.123, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Approved screeners. (a) A district must administer an approved evidence-based reading screener to students in kindergarten through grade 3 within the first six weeks of the school year, by February 15 each year, and again within the last six weeks of the school year. new text begin A district must provide screening accommodations to students who need accommodations. new text end The screener must be one of the screening tools approved by the Department of Education. A district must identify any screener it uses in the district's annual literacy plan, and submit screening data with the annual literacy plan by June 15. (b) Starting in the 2024-2025 school year, district staff and external partners offering literacy supports in schools may only use screeners that have been approved by the Department of Education. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.123, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Professional development. (a) A district must provide training from a menu of approved evidence-based training programs to the following teachers and staff by July 1, 2026: (1) reading intervention teachers working with students in kindergarten through grade 12; (2) all classroom teachers of students in kindergarten through grade 3 and children in prekindergarten programs; (3) kindergarten through grade 12 special education teachers responsible for foundational reading instruction; (4) curriculum directors; (5) instructional support staff, contractors, and volunteers who assist in providing reading interventions under the oversight and monitoring of a trained licensed teacher; (6) employees who select literacy instructional materials for a district; and (7) teachers holding English as a second language teaching licenses. (b) A district must provide training from a menu of approved evidence-based training programs to the following teachers by July 1, 2027: (1) teachers who provide foundational reading instruction to students in grades 4 to 12; (2) teachers who provide instruction to students in a state-approved alternative program; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) teachers who provide instruction to students in dual language immersion programsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) licensed library media specialists who select district library materials. new text end (c) The commissioner of education may grant a district an extension to the deadlines in this subdivision. (d) Training provided by the following may satisfy the professional development requirements under this subdivision: (1) a certified trained facilitator; or (2) a training program that the department has determined meets the professional development requirements under the Read Act. (e) Beginning July 1, 2027, an educator required to receive training under paragraph (a), who is new to the state of Minnesota or is a newly licensed teacher who did not receive instruction in the teaching of foundational reading skills based on structured literacy, must complete one of the approved required trainings. Training must be offered through the regional literacy network and facilitated by a local certified trained facilitator. The Department of Education must review district literacy lead waiver requests and grant waivers to educators new to the state or educators who provide reading instruction exclusively using alternatives to sound-based approaches, and who have completed the professional development requirements consistent with this subdivision. (f) For the 2024-2025 deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end 2025-2026new text begin , and 2026-2027new text end school years only, the hours of instruction requirement under section 120A.41 for students in elementary and secondary school, as defined in section 120A.05, subdivisions 9 and 13, is reduced by 5-1/2 hours for a district that enters into an agreement with the exclusive representative of the teachers that requires teachers to receive at least 5-1/2 hours of approved evidence-based training required under this subdivision, on a day when other students in the district receive instruction. If a charter school's teachers are not represented by an exclusive representative, the charter school may reduce the number of instructional hours for students in elementary and secondary school, as defined in section 120A.05, subdivisions 9 and 13, by 5-1/2 hours after consulting with its teachers in order to provide teachers with at least 5-1/2 hours of evidence-based training required under this subdivision on a day when other students receive instruction. The hours of instruction reduction for secondary school students is applicable only for the 2025-2026new text begin and 2026-2027new text end school deleted text begin yeardeleted text end new text begin yearsnew text end . Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.123, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Accessibility standards. new text end new text begin (a) All professional development and digital curriculum resources must comply with the accessibility standards developed according to section 16E.03, subdivision 9. new text end new text begin (b) Professional development provided in accordance with the Read Act is subject to the requirements of section 363A.43. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.124, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Ongoing review of literacy materials. new text begin (a) By June 1, 2027, the department must establish an ongoing review process in order to identify curriculum and intervention materials that are evidence-based, focused on structural literacy, culturally and linguistically responsive, and reflective of diverse populations. new text end The department may partner with one or more institutions of higher education new text begin or a third party new text end to conduct independent and objective reviews of curriculum and intervention materials. The department must determine whether it will partner with an institution of higher education new text begin or a third party new text end to conduct ongoing reviews of literacy materials by June 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2027new text end . A publisher may submit curriculum or intervention materials for review. The publisher is responsible for paying the cost of the review directly to deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin a partnering new text end institution of higher educationnew text begin or third partynew text end . The review must use the new text begin Read Act new text end rubric used to approve curriculum deleted text begin and postdeleted text end new text begin . The department may modify the Read Act rubric to reflect the needs of grade levels and special populations, including the Minnesota English Language Arts standards, culturally and linguistically responsive criteria, and criteria reflective of diverse populations.new text end The new text begin Read Act new text end rubric new text begin must be posted new text end on the department website. The department and deleted text begin institution of higher educationdeleted text end new text begin its partnernew text end may approve the curriculum or intervention materials if they determine that the curriculum or intervention materials are evidence-based, focused on structured literacy, culturally and linguistically responsive, and reflect diverse populations. The department must add the approved curriculum or intervention materials to the list of curricula and materials approved under the Read Act.new text begin Following each review cycle, the department must post the findings of the curriculum and intervention materials review on the department website.new text end new text begin (b) The reviewed resources must be categorized as highly aligned, partially aligned, minimally aligned, or not aligned to evidence-based structural literacy practices. For purposes of this subdivision, the reviewed resource categories are defined as follows: new text end new text begin (1) "highly aligned" means 100 percent of domains were at or above the cut point with no significant red flags identified for the program. Curriculum and intervention materials that are not reviewed do not meet criteria for Tier 1 interventions and must not be categorized as highly aligned; new text end new text begin (2) "partially aligned" means 60 to 99 percent of domains were at or above the cut point; new text end new text begin (3) "minimally aligned" means 34 to 59 percent of domains were at or above the cut point; and new text end new text begin (4) "not aligned" means 33 percent or less of domains were at or above the cut point. new text end new text begin When planning for curriculum implementation, it is a district's responsibility to verify that curriculum and intervention materials align with evidence-based structured literacy practices. A district must resolve any issues identified by the department in the review of materials using the Read Act rubric and report of reviewed resources. new text end new text begin (c) A district must ensure that any red flags for a program are resolved through district enhancements to the selected program. new text end new text begin (d) A program undergoing a full review cycle must be added to the reviewed curricula and intervention program list after the review process is completed. new text end new text begin (e) Resources that are categorized as highly aligned to evidence-based structural literacy practices qualify for use of literacy aid under section 124D.98 or state funding provided under the Read Act. Resources that are categorized as partially aligned, minimally aligned, or not aligned to evidence-based structural literacy practices do not qualify for use of literacy aid under section 124D.98 or state funding provided under the Read Act. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end